Washington statutes.
RCW 38.14.030

Training.

Members of the Washington state guard may participate in such training opportunities as may be available from the federal government and as approved by the adjutant general. Where required as a condition of such participation, the military department may reimburse the federal government for the costs of such training.

[ 1989 c 19 s 27.]